Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-254
Department of Correctional Services; convey described property.

The Department of Correctional Services is authorized by the Legislature to convey by quitclaim deed to the county of Lancaster, Nebraska, for the widening and improvement of Old Cheney Road and South Folsom Streets, a part of lot 43, irregular tract in the southeast quarter, and of lot 41, irregular tract in the northeast quarter, both in section 10, township 9 north, range 6 east of the 6th principal meridian, Lancaster County, Nebraska, more particularly described as follows: Referring to the southeast corner of the southeast quarter of said section 10; thence westerly with the south line of the said southeast quarter to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of the said southeast quarter; thence northerly with the west line of the said southeast quarter of the southeast quarter to a point thirty-three feet distant from and measured perpendicular to the said south line, said point being a point of intersection with the existing northerly right-of-way line of West Old Cheney Road and the point of beginning; thence continuing with the last-described course to a point fifty feet distant from the said south line; thence easterly parallel with the said south line, a distance of seven hundred twenty-one and ninety-five hundredths feet, more or less, to a point of intersection with the existing northerly right-of-way line; thence southwesterly on a deflection angle of one hundred sixty-seven degrees, twenty-three minutes, thirty-eight seconds right, with the said right-of-way line, a distance of seventy-seven and eighty-nine hundredths feet to a point thirty-three feet northerly from and measured perpendicular to the said south line; thence westerly parallel with the said south line to the point of beginning; and referring to the southwest corner of the southeast quarter of said section 10; thence northerly with the west line of the said southeast quarter, a distance of one thousand three hundred nineteen and nineteen hundredths feet, more or less, to the southwest corner of the northwest quarter of the southeast quarter, said point also being the point of beginning; thence easterly with the south line of the said northwest quarter of the southeast quarter to a point fifty feet distant from the said west line; thence northerly parallel with the said west line to a point of intersection with the existing easterly right-of-way of South Folsom Street, said point located one hundred forty-one and twenty-two hundredths feet southerly from the northwest corner of the northeast quarter of said section 10, as measured with the said west line; thence southwesterly on a deflection angle of one hundred sixty-eight degrees, twenty-one minutes, thirty-six seconds left, with the said right-of-way line, a distance of eighty-four and twenty-six hundredths feet; thence westerly perpendicular to the said west line, a distance of thirty-three feet to a point of intersection with the said west line, said point also being two hundred twenty-three and seventy-five hundredths feet southerly from the said northwest corner; thence southerly with the said west line to the point of beginning; containing four and sixty-one hundredths acres, more or less.

Laws 1990, LB 970, § 1.